Maryland, session 2026, HB0206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
2.
(A) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE membership
of the Senate shall consist of forty–seven (47) Senators. The membership of the House of
Delegates shall consist of one hundred forty–one (141) Delegates.
(B) BEGINNING WITH THE 2033 LEGISLATIVE SESSION:
(1) THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE SENATE SHALL CONSIST OF
FORTY–EIGHT (48) SENATORS; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0206*

HOUSE BILL 206
(2) THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES SHALL
CONSIST OF ONE HUNDRED FORTY–FOUR (144) DELEGATES.
6.
[A] EXCEPT FOR SENATORS SERVING A TWO–YEAR TERM AS PROVIDED UNDER
SECTION 7(A) OF THIS ARTICLE, A member of the General Assembly shall be elected by
the registered voters of the legislative or delegate district from which [he] THE MEMBER
seeks election, to serve for a term of four years beginning on the second Wednesday of
January following [his] THE MEMBER’S election.
7.
(A) THE ELECTION FOR SENATORS SHALL TAKE PLACE ON THE TUESDAY
NEXT, AFTER THE FIRST MONDAY IN THE MONTH OF NOVEMBER AS FOLLOWS:
(1) TWO THOUSAND AND TWENTY–EIGHT, FORTY–SEVEN (47)
SENATORS ELECTED TO A TERM OF FOUR YEARS; AND
(2) TWO THOUSAND AND THIRTY–TWO, FORTY–EIGHT (48) SENATORS
ELECTED TO A TERM DETERMINED AS FOLLOWS:
(I) THE TWENTY–FOUR (24) SENATORS RECEIVING THE
LOWEST NUMBER OF TOTAL VOTES IN THE ELECTION ELECTED TO A TERM OF TWO
YEARS, WITH THE ELECTION FOR EACH SENATE SEAT HELD AGAIN IN TWO
THOUSAND AND THIRTY–FOUR AND IN EVERY FOURTH YEAR THEREAFTER; AND
(II) THE TWENTY–FOUR (24) SENATORS RECEIVING THE
HIGHEST NUMBER OF TOTAL VOTES IN THE ELECTION ELECTED TO A TERM OF FOUR
YEARS, WITH THE ELECTION FOR EACH SENATE SEAT HELD AGAIN IN TWO
THOUSAND AND THIRTY–SIX AND EVERY FOUR YEARS THEREAFTER.
(B) The election for [Senators and] Delegates shall take place on the Tuesday
next, after the first Monday in the month of November, nineteen hundred and fifty–eight,
and in every fourth year thereafter.
10.
(A) No member of Congress, or person holding any civil, or military office under
the United States, shall be eligible as a Senator, or Delegate; and if any person shall after
[his] THE PERSON’S election as Senator, or Delegate, be elected to Congress, or be
appointed to any office, civil, or military, under the Government of the United States, [his]
THE PERSON’S acceptance thereof, shall vacate [his] THE PERSON’S seat; except that a

HOUSE BILL 206 3
Senator or Delegate may be a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the
United States or a member of the militia of the United States or this State.
(B) A SERVING DELEGATE WHO SEEKS ELECTION AS A SENATOR FOR A
SENATE TERM THAT BEGINS BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE DELEGATE’S TERM
SHALL VACATE THE SEAT OF DELEGATE ON THE FIRST DAY OF THE NEXT
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING LEGISLATIVE SESSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.